District of Columbia statutes.
1-610.73

Treatment of lateral law enforcement officers as police hired after September 30, 1987.

Except as provided in § 1-610.74 a lateral law enforcement officer hired pursuant to § 1-610.72 shall be covered by the provisions of this chapter applicable to members of the Metropolitan Police Department hired after September 30, 1987.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1073
as added Oct. 4, 2000, D.C. Law 13-160, § 102(b), 47 DCR 4619
1981 Ed., § 1-611.73.
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 2(b) of the Lateral Appointment of Law Enforcement Officers Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-305, April 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2701).